Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.170

Application of proceeds.

If the sale is made, the proceeds must be applied in the following order: First, to the amount of the homestead exemption, to be paid to the judgment debtor; second, up to the amount of the execution, to be applied to the satisfaction of the execution; third, the balance to be paid to the judgment debtor.

[ 1987 c 442 s 217; 1981 c 329 s 19; 1895 c 64 s 20; RRS s 548. Formerly RCW 6.12.250.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.